Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-291
Claim; notice; who may file.

The notice mentioned in section 76-290 may be filed for record by the claimant of any interest therein described or by any other person acting on behalf of a claimant who is under disability, unable to assert a claim on his own behalf, or one of a class but whose identity cannot be established or is uncertain at the time of filing such claim for record.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 4, p. 764.